New York, session 2025-2026, A10887.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "New York innovative learning models act". 3 § 2. Findings and purposes. 1. The legislature finds that: 4 a. Rapid shifts in technology, workforce needs and educational deliv- 5 ery methods call for more flexible and innovative learning models; 6 b. Students in New York state benefit from expanded opportunities that 7 complement traditional classroom instruction through blended, project- 8 based, competency-based, and other models of learning; 9 c. To maintain and enhance the competitiveness of New York's economy 10 and meet the needs of employers and communities, the state must support 11 schools and education entities in designing, implementing, and scaling 12 such innovative models; and 13 d. A state-led grant program can incentivize and accelerate the 14 adoption and continuous improvement of innovative learning models across 15 the state's varied school districts and types of educational insti- 16 tutions. 17 2. It is the purpose of this act to: 18 a. Establish a competitive grant program that supports local educa- 19 tional agencies, districts, charter schools, and other eligible entities 20 in the development and implementation of innovative learning models; 21 b. Promote research, evaluation and dissemination of best practices 22 for such models; and 23 c. Ensure accountability and continuous improvement of participating 24 models to improve student outcomes, including academic achievement, 25 college and career readiness, and equity in access. 26 § 3. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3602-g to 27 read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14683-01-6 A. 10887 2 1 § 3602-g. Innovative learning grant program. 1. Definitions. As used 2 in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 3 a. "Local education agency" means a public school district, public 4 charter school, board of cooperative educational services, or other 5 public school entity under state law. 6 b. "Eligible entity" means a local education agency or a partnership 7 thereof. For the purposes of this section, entities that have partner- 8 ships with local education agencies may include, but need not be limited 9 to, institutions of higher education, nonprofit organizations, or commu- 10 nity-based organizations that propose to plan, develop or implement an 11 innovative learning model. 12 c. "Innovative learning model" means a school or instructional model 13 that: 14 (i) fundamentally redesigns the learning environment and uses blended, 15 personalized, competency-based, and student-driven approaches; 16 (ii) includes flexible scheduling, modular curricula, adaptive tech- 17 nologies, project-based or experiential learning; 18 (iii) demonstrates potential for improving student outcomes, especial- 19 ly for historically underserved populations; and 20 (iv) has a clearly defined evaluation plan and intends to scale or 21 replicate if effective. 22 2. Innovative learning grant program. a. The department, in consulta- 23 tion with the regents, shall establish an innovative learning grant 24 program. Within amounts appropriated or otherwise available therefor, 25 the department shall award grants to eligible entities for the planning, 26 development, implementation, replication and scaling of innovative 27 learning models. 28 b. No later than twelve months after the effective date of this 29 section and annually thereafter, the department shall publish notice of 30 the availability of funds, application procedures, selection criteria, 31 performance expectations and reporting requirements of the grant 32 program. 33 c. The department shall give priority to proposals that: 34 (i) focus on underserved student populations, including students with 35 disabilities, English language learners, economically disadvantaged 36 students, and rural or urban high-need districts; 37 (ii) demonstrate partnerships across sectors (e.g., K-12, higher 38 education, business, nonprofit); 39 (iii) include rigorous evaluation and measurement of student outcomes; 40 and 41 (iv) have a plan for sustainability and potential for replication. 42 d. An eligible entity that receives a grant pursuant to this section 43 may use such grant funds for activities including but not limited to: 44 (i) designing or redesigning curricula and instructional models; 45 (ii) professional development for educators and staff in new learning 46 models; 47 (iii) technology acquisition and infrastructure to support blended or 48 adaptive learning; 49 (iv) pilot implementation of the innovative model; 50 (v) data systems and assessment tools aligned to the model; and 51 (vi) scaling or replication of successful models across additional 52 schools or districts. 53 e. The grant program may include tiers of awards provided that there 54 are appropriate performance benchmarks for each tier. For the purposes 55 of this section, tiers of awards may include, but need not be limited 56 to, planning grants, implementation grants, and scale-up grants. A. 10887 3 1 f. The department shall coordinate dissemination of successful innova- 2 tive learning models, best practices, and lessons learned statewide, 3 including through webinars, reports and state education conferences. 4 3. Evaluation, reporting and accountability. a. Each grantee shall 5 submit annual reports to the department, including baseline and outcome 6 data, implementation milestones, fidelity of model, cost-effectiveness, 7 and plans for future phases. 8 b. The department shall compile and publish a statewide annual report 9 on the grant program. Such report shall include, but need not be limited 10 to, the following data: 11 (i) the number of grants awarded; 12 (ii) the types of models supported; 13 (iii) the student demographics served; 14 (iv) student outcomes; 15 (v) cost metrics; and 16 (vi) policy recommendations. 17 c. The department shall conduct or contract for an independent evalu- 18 ation of the overall grant program every three years. Such evaluation 19 shall assess student achievement, graduation rates, college or career 20 readiness, equity impacts, and scalability of models. 21 d. The department and the regents may suspend or terminate funding for 22 a grantee that: 23 (i) fails to meet agreed performance targets; 24 (ii) fails to submit required reports; or 25 (iii) does not maintain fiscal accountability. 26 4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the authori- 27 ty of the department to enforce existing state law, regulations and 28 oversight of local education agencies. 29 § 4. The department of education is hereby authorized to promulgate 30 any rules or regulations necessary for the implementation of this act. 31 § 5. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 32 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 33 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 34 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 35 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 36 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 37 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 38 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 39 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 40 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.